Hawaii statutes.
[§803-17] United States marshal or deputy
United States marshal; arrest powers. A United States marshal or deputy
United States marshal, without a warrant, may arrest a person if:

(1) The marshal or deputy marshal is on duty;

(2) One or more of the following situations exists:

(A) The person commits an assault or other
crime involving physical harm, defined and punishable under chapter 707,
against the marshal or deputy marshal or against any other person in the
presence of the marshal or deputy marshal;

(B) The marshal or deputy marshal has probable
cause to believe that a crime as provided in subparagraph (A) has been
committed and has probable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has
committed the crime; or

(C) The marshal or deputy marshal has received
information by written, telegraphic, telephonic, radio, or other authoritative
source that a law enforcement officer holds a warrant for the person's arrest;
and

(3) The head of the Hawaii district office for the
United States [Marshals] Service certifies to the State that the marshal or
deputy marshal has received proper training within the agency to enable that
officer to enforce or administer this section. [L 2008, c 95, §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next